dictionaries/da_DK.aff
FLAG num
#Adjektiv, ender på -er, bøjes med -re
SFX 41 Y 280
SFX 41 er re/34 [^b]ber
SFX 41 er re/34 [^c]cer
SFX 41 er re/34 [^d]der
SFX 41 er re/34 [^f]fer
SFX 41 er re/34 [^g]ger
SFX 41 er re/34 [^h]her
SFX 41 er re/34 [^j]jer
SFX 41 er re/34 [^k]ker
SFX 41 er re/34 [^l]ler
SFX 41 er re/34 [^m]mer
SFX 41 er re/34 [^n]ner
SFX 41 er re/34 [^p]per
SFX 41 er re/34 [^q]qer
SFX 41 er re/34 [^r]rer
SFX 41 er re/34 [^s]ser
SFX 41 er re/34 [^t]ter
SFX 41 er re/34 [^v]ver
SFX 41 er re/34 [^w]wer
SFX 41 er re/34 [^x]xer
SFX 41 er re/34 [^z]zer
SFX 41 er res/34 [^b]ber	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^c]cer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^d]der	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^f]fer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^g]ger	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^h]her	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^j]jer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^k]ker	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^l]ler	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^m]mer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^n]ner	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^p]per	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^q]qer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^r]rer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^s]ser	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^t]ter	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^v]ver	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^w]wer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^x]xer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er res/34 [^z]zer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^b]ber	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^c]cer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^d]der	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^f]fer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^g]ger	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^h]her	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^j]jer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^k]ker	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^l]ler	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^m]mer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^n]ner	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^p]per	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^q]qer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^r]rer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^s]ser	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^t]ter	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^v]ver	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^w]wer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^x]xer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er rere/34 [^z]zer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^b]ber	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^c]cer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^d]der	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^f]fer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^g]ger	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^h]her	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^j]jer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^k]ker	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^l]ler	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^m]mer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^n]ner	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^p]per	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^q]qer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^r]rer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^s]ser	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^t]ter	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^v]ver	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^w]wer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^x]xer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er reres/34 [^z]zer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^b]ber	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^c]cer	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^d]der	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^f]fer	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^g]ger	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^h]her	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^j]jer	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^k]ker	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^l]ler	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^m]mer	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^n]ner	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^p]per	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^q]qer	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^r]rer	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^s]ser	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^t]ter	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^v]ver	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^w]wer	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^x]xer	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er rest/34,90,89 [^z]zer	+SUPERLATIV
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^b]ber	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^c]cer	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^d]der	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^f]fer	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^g]ger	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^h]her	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^j]jer	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^k]ker	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^l]ler	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^m]mer	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^n]ner	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^p]per	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^q]qer	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^r]rer	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^s]ser	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^t]ter	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^v]ver	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^w]wer	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^x]xer	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er reste/34,90,89 [^z]zer	+SUPERLATIV_PLURALIS
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^b]ber	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^c]cer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^d]der	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^f]fer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^g]ger	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^h]her	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^j]jer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^k]ker	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^l]ler	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^m]mer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^n]ner	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^p]per	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^q]qer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^r]rer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^s]ser	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^t]ter	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^v]ver	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^w]wer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^x]xer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 er restes/34,90,89 [^z]zer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ber re/34 bber
SFX 41 cer re/34 ccer
SFX 41 der re/34 dder
SFX 41 fer re/34 ffer
SFX 41 ger re/34 gger
SFX 41 her re/34 hher
SFX 41 jer re/34 jjer
SFX 41 ker re/34 kker
SFX 41 ler re/34 ller
SFX 41 mer re/34 mmer
SFX 41 ner re/34 nner
SFX 41 per re/34 pper
SFX 41 qer re/34 qqer
SFX 41 rer re/34 rrer
SFX 41 ser re/34 sser
SFX 41 ter re/34 tter
SFX 41 ver re/34 vver
SFX 41 wer re/34 wwer
SFX 41 xer re/34 xxer
SFX 41 zer re/34 zzer
SFX 41 ber res/34 bber	+GENITIV
SFX 41 cer res/34 ccer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 der res/34 dder	+GENITIV
SFX 41 fer res/34 ffer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ger res/34 gger	+GENITIV
SFX 41 her res/34 hher	+GENITIV
SFX 41 jer res/34 jjer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ker res/34 kker	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ler res/34 ller	+GENITIV
SFX 41 mer res/34 mmer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ner res/34 nner	+GENITIV
SFX 41 per res/34 pper	+GENITIV
SFX 41 qer res/34 qqer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 rer res/34 rrer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ser res/34 sser	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ter res/34 tter	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ver res/34 vver	+GENITIV
SFX 41 wer res/34 wwer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 xer res/34 xxer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 zer res/34 zzer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ber rere/34 bber	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 cer rere/34 ccer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 der rere/34 dder	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 fer rere/34 ffer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 ger rere/34 gger	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 her rere/34 hher	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 jer rere/34 jjer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 ker rere/34 kker	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 ler rere/34 ller	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 mer rere/34 mmer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 ner rere/34 nner	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 per rere/34 pper	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 qer rere/34 qqer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 rer rere/34 rrer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 ser rere/34 sser	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 ter rere/34 tter	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 ver rere/34 vver	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 wer rere/34 wwer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 xer rere/34 xxer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 zer rere/34 zzer	+KOMPARATIV
SFX 41 ber reres/34 bber	+GENITIV
SFX 41 cer reres/34 ccer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 der reres/34 dder	+GENITIV
SFX 41 fer reres/34 ffer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ger reres/34 gger	+GENITIV
SFX 41 her reres/34 hher	+GENITIV
SFX 41 jer reres/34 jjer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ker reres/34 kker	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ler reres/34 ller	+GENITIV
SFX 41 mer reres/34 mmer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ner reres/34 nner	+GENITIV
SFX 41 per reres/34 pper	+GENITIV
SFX 41 qer reres/34 qqer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 rer reres/34 rrer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ser reres/34 sser	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ter reres/34 tter	+GENITIV
SFX 41 ver reres/34 vver	+GENITIV
SFX 41 wer reres/34 wwer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 xer reres/34 xxer	+GENITIV
SFX 41 zer reres/34 zzer	+GENITIV
